Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6760XS (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 2324 Section 1. Section 476.6, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 22. Large energy use facilities. 3 a. For purposes of this subsection: 4 (1) âCosts of servingâ includes, as applicable, the costs 5 incurred by an electric utility in providing transmission, 6 distribution, energy, capacity, or ancillary electricity 7 services, and any related costs or associated risks with 8 serving a customer class or customer. 9 (2) âLarge energy use facilityâ means a facility that uses 10 or is able to use twenty megawatts or more and is primarily 11 engaged in providing a service as described under code number 12 518210 of the North American industry classification system. 13 b. The commission shall create a customer class for each 14 customer that is a large energy use facility. The customer 15 class must be separate and distinct from customer classes for 16 other customers and have its own rates, charges, and schedules. 17 Any rate, charge, or schedule approved by the commission for 18 the class must meet all of the following requirements: 19 (1) Directly assign the costs of serving to the customer. 20 (2) Mitigate the risk of other customer classes paying 21 unwarranted costs. 22 (3) Mitigate the risk of shifting, in an unwarranted manner, 23 the costs of serving a customer that is a large energy use 24 facility to other customer classes, including costs incurred by 25 an electric utility to meet load requirements resulting from 26 the provision of electricity service to a customer that is a 27 large energy use facility. 28 c. In deciding whether to approve a proposed rate, charge, 29 or schedule of an electric utility for a customer class 30 described under this subsection, the commission shall consider 31 whether the rate, charge, or schedule may do any of the 32 following: 33 (1) Result in, or have the potential to result in, increased 34 costs or unwarranted risk to other customers. 35 -1- LSB 6760XS (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2324 (2) Provide for equitable contributions to grid efficiency, 1 reliability, and resiliency benefits. 2 (3) Meet any other conditions the commission may require in 3 the public interest. 4 d. An electric utility and a customer that is a large 5 energy use facility are not required to use a classification of 6 service provided for under this subsection if the commission 7 has not approved for the electric utility a rate, charge, or 8 schedule for that classification of service. 9 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to electric utility 10 services provided to large energy use facilities constructed or 11 expanded on or after January 1, 2027. 12